District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.156

Alley Rehabilitation Project.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Chief Financial Officer shall transfer to and retain in the Alley Rehabilitation Project the first $6 million of surplus capital funds identified pursuant to § 1-325.153a or § 1-325.153b, to be made available for purposes of the Alley Rehabilitation Project through a reprograming pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 47 [§ 47-301 et seq.].

(b)

This section shall expire on September 30, 2016.

March 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1266
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 8042(g), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 8042(g) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).